Illinois, session 104th, HB4264.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Private Business and Vocational Schools Act 5of 2012 is amended by changing Section 30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 426/30)7    Sec. 30. Exemptions. For purposes of this Act, the 8following shall not be considered to be a private business and 9vocational school: 10        (1) Any institution devoted entirely to the teaching 11    of religion or theology. 12        (2) Any in-service program of study and subject 13    offered by an employer, provided that no tuition is 14    charged and the instruction is offered only to employees 15    of the employer. 16        (3) Any educational institution that (A) enrolls a 17    majority of its students in degree programs and has 18    maintained an accredited status with a regional 19    accrediting agency that is recognized by the U.S. 20    Department of Education or (B) enrolls students in one or 21    more bachelor-level programs, enrolls a majority of its 22    students in degree programs, and is accredited by a 23    national or regional accrediting agency that is recognized   HB4264- 2 -LRB104 15990 LNS 29238 b1    by the U.S. Department of Education or that (i) is 2    regulated by the Board under the Private College Act or 3    the Academic Degree Act or is exempt from such regulation 4    under either the Private College Act or the Academic 5    Degree Act solely for the reason that the educational 6    institution was in operation on the effective date of 7    either the Private College Act or the Academic Degree Act 8    or (ii) is regulated by the State Board of Education. 9        (4) Any institution and the franchisees of that 10    institution that exclusively offer a program of study in 11    income tax theory or return preparation at a total 12    contract price of no more than $400, provided that the 13    total annual enrollment of the institution for all such 14    courses of instruction exceeds 500 students and further 15    provided that the total contract price for all instruction 16    offered to a student in any one calendar year does not 17    exceed $3,000. 18        (5) Any person or organization selling mediated 19    instruction products through a media, such as tapes, 20    compact discs, digital video discs, or similar media, so 21    long as the instruction is not intended to result in the 22    acquisition of training for a specific employment field, 23    is not intended to meet a qualification for licensure or 24    certification in an employment field, or is not intended 25    to provide credit that can be applied toward a certificate 26    or degree program.   HB4264- 3 -LRB104 15990 LNS 29238 b1        (6) Schools with no physical presence in this State. 2    Schools offering instruction or programs of study, but 3    that have no physical presence in this State, are not 4    required to receive Board approval. Such an institution 5    must not be considered not to have a physical presence in 6    this State unless it has received a written finding from 7    the Board that it has no physical presence. In determining 8    whether an institution has no physical presence, the Board 9    shall require all of the following: 10            (A) Evidence of authorization to operate in at 11        least one other state and that the school is in good 12        standing with that state's authorizing agency. 13            (B) Evidence that the school has a means of 14        receiving and addressing student complaints in 15        compliance with any federal or state requirements. 16            (C) Evidence that the institution is providing no 17        instruction in this State. 18            (D) Evidence that the institution is not providing 19        core academic support services, including, but not 20        limited to, admissions, evaluation, assessment, 21        registration, financial aid, academic scheduling, and 22        faculty hiring and support in this State. 23        (7) A school or program within a school that 24    exclusively provides yoga instruction, yoga teacher 25    training, or both.26        (8) Organizations that receive funding from the   HB4264- 4 -LRB104 15990 LNS 29238 b1    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 2    workforce development preparation programs as provided for 3    in the Energy Transition Act and the Illinois Works Jobs 4    Program Act in which participants are not charged tuition. 5    This paragraph does not include public institutions of 6    higher education or private institutions of higher 7    education, as defined in the Board of Higher Education 8    Act, or community colleges, as defined in the Public 9    Community College Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the 10    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 11    provide the Board of Higher Education a complete list of 12    all qualifying organizations under this paragraph on July 13    1 of each year. 14        (9) Labor organizations, as defined in Section 10 of 15    the Collective Bargaining Freedom Act, that sponsor a 16    United States Department of Labor registered 17    apprenticeship program. 18        (10) An educational institution that offers 19    instruction or programs of study for which the participant 20    or student is not charged any tuition or fees other than a 21    nominal fee to cover the costs of books, tools, and 22    similar materials. For the purposes of this paragraph, 23    "tuition" does not include donations, grants, or other 24    sources of funding paid to the educational institution by 25    a third party to support the instruction or program of 26    study.   HB4264- 5 -LRB104 15990 LNS 29238 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1046, eff. 6-7-22; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.)